Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2053.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of water resources; stormwater recharge mapping; definition A. The sum of $100,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of water resources for updated stormwater recharge mapping. B. Within one year after the effective date of this section, the department of water resources shall create an updated map of potential stormwater recharge sites in this state that would not, if developed, and in the director's sole discretion pursuant to title 45, chapter 1, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, appropriate appropriable or appropriated surface water or conflict with vested rights under title 45, chapter 1, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes. C. The updated stormwater recharge map shall identify the location of potential stormwater recharge sites in this state that meet all of the following criteria: 1. Are located on any lands in this state, including public and private lands. 2. Have optimum soil conditions for stormwater infiltration and groundwater recharge. The director shall coordinate with the state natural resource conservation board established by section 41-6011, Arizona Revised Statutes, for the purposes of identifying the locations with ideal soil conditions for stormwater infiltration. 3. Would not, if developed, and in the director's sole discretion pursuant to title 45, chapter 1, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, appropriate appropriable or appropriated surface water or conflict with vested rights, under title 45, chapter 1, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes. D. For the purposes of this section, "stormwater" means unappropriated rainwater runoff that does not enter a stream or natural channel or that is otherwise lost to evaporation.